Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,118
Shareholders information; rules and regulations.

In accordance with the provisions of sections 44-3,115 to 44-3,118, the Director of Insurance shall adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as are reasonable, necessary, or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of investors (1) to define the provisions and applicability of sections 44-3,115 to 44-3,118, (2) to require that information including proxy statements be transmitted to shareholders and to prescribe the kind, content, and form of such information and the circumstances, time, and manner in which such information shall be transmitted, (3) to prescribe the content, form, and requirements of proxies, consents, and authorizations and the circumstances, time, and manner in which such proxies, consents, and authorizations may be solicited, and (4) to require that information, including forms of proxy statements, proxies, consents, and authorizations, be filed with the director and to prescribe the kind, content, and form of such information and the circumstances, time, and manner in which such information shall be filed.

Laws 1965, c. 249, § 4, p. 707;

Laws 1969, c. 369, § 6, p. 1312;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 115.